Utah statutes.
70A-9a-108.   Sufficiency of description.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (3), (4), and (5), a
description of personal or real property is sufficient, whether or not it is
specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), a description of
collateral reasonably identifies the collateral if it identifies the
collateral by:
(a)  specific listing;
(b)  category;
(c)  except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5), a type of collateral
defined in this title;
(d)  quantity;
(e)  computational or allocational formula or procedure; or
(f)  except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), any other method, if the
identity of the collateral is objectively determinable.
(3)  A description of collateral as "all the debtor's assets" or "all the
debtor's personal property" or using words of similar import does not
reasonably identify the collateral.
(4)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5), a description of a
security entitlement, securities account, or commodity account is sufficient
if it describes:
(a)  the collateral by those terms or as investment property; or
(b)  the underlying financial asset or commodity contract.
(5)  A description only by type of collateral defined in this title is an
insufficient description of:
(a)  a commercial tort claim; or
(b)  in a consumer transaction, consumer goods, a security entitlement, a
securities account, or a commodity account.
